Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1394
Participation in employee discount
program; authorized.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any state employee
may participate in an employee discount program administered by the personnel
division of the Department of Administrative Services. Any such program shall
be made available to all state employees.

Laws 2009, LB167, § 1.